California statutes. Education Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94807.

The Student Tuition Recovery Fund established by former Section 94944 of the Education Code, and extended by Chapter 635 of the Statutes of 2007, is continued in existence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94808.

(a) Any Student Tuition Recovery Fund claims received by the former Bureau for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education prior to July 1, 2007, that were not processed by the former Bureau for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education and were not paid by the Department of Consumer Affairs from July 1, 2007, to June 30, 2008, inclusive, shall be processed by the bureau.

(b) Any Student Tuition Recovery Fund claims received by the Department of Consumer Affairs from July 1, 2007, to December 31, 2009, inclusive, shall be processed by the bureau.

(c) Student Tuition Recovery Fund claims filed with, and approved by, the former
 Bureau for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education as of June 30, 2007, if not already paid, shall be paid before any claims approved after that date.

(d) The student’s right to recovery from the Student Tuition Recovery Fund shall be based on the law that was in effect when the student enrolled and a fee for the fund was charged as a part of tuition costs, even though that law has become inoperative, been repealed, or otherwise expired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94809.

(a) An institution that had an application for an approval to operate pending with the former Bureau for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education on June 30, 2007, may continue to operate until a decision is made in regard to the institution regarding the application for approval to operate, but shall comply with, and is subject to, this chapter.

(b) An institution that did not have a valid approval to operate issued by, and did not have an application for approval to operate pending with, the former Bureau for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education on June 30, 2007, that began operations between July 1, 2007, and January 1, 2010, and filed an application to operate by August 2, 2010, may continue to operate
 unless a denial of approval to operate has been issued and has become final, but shall comply with, and is subject to, this chapter.

(c) Students seeking to enroll in institutions operating under subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be notified by the institution, in writing and prior to executing an enrollment agreement, that the institution’s application for approval to operate has not been reviewed by the bureau.

(d) (1) An institution that is denied an approval to operate pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) may file an appeal pursuant to the procedures established in Section 94888.

(2) An institution that has filed an appeal pursuant to paragraph (1) may continue to operate during the appeal process but must disclose in a written statement approved by the bureau, to all current and prospective
 students, that the institution’s application for approval to operate was denied by the bureau because the bureau determined the application did not satisfy the requirements to operate in California, that the institution is appealing the bureau’s decision, and that the loss of the appeal may result in the institution’s closure.

(3) If the bureau determines that the continued operation of an institution poses a significant risk of harm to students, the bureau shall make an emergency decision pursuant to Section 94938.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 593, Sec. 3.   (SB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94809.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(a) For any claims that a student had based on a violation of the Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education Reform Act of 1989 on or before June 30, 2007, the period of time from June 30, 2007, to December 31, 2009, inclusive, shall be excluded in determining the deadline or the statute of limitation for filing any claim with the bureau or a lawsuit based on any claim.

(b) All claims described in subdivision (a), except claims to the Student Tuition Recovery Fund, including those contained in a lawsuit or other legal action, shall be determined or
 adjudicated based on the law that was in effect when the violations or events took place, even though those provisions have become inoperative, been repealed, or otherwise expired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94809.6.

(a) Notwithstanding the inoperative status or repeal of the former Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education Reform Act of 1989 on or after July 1, 2007, any claim or cause of action in any manner based on the act that was commenced on or before June 30, 2007, whether or not reduced to a final judgment, shall be preserved, and any remedy that was or could have been ordered to redress a violation of the act on or before June 30, 2007, may be ordered or maintained thereafter. If a final judgment was obtained in an action commenced on or after July 1, 2007, under the authority of Chapter 635 of the Statutes of 2007, the final judgment and any legal remedy that was or could be maintained on or after July 1, 2007, under that statute, shall be preserved and
 maintained thereafter.

(b) The rights, obligations, claims, causes of action, and remedies described in subdivision (a) shall be determined by the provisions of the former Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education Reform Act of 1989 in effect on or before June 30, 2007, notwithstanding the inoperative status or repeal of the former Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education Reform Act of 1989 on or after July 1, 2007.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Definitions [94810. - 94871.]

94810.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94812.

“Academic year” means a period, including a minimum of 30 weeks of instructional time, in which a full-time student attending an institution that measures educational program length in credit hours completes 24 semester or trimester hours or 36 quarter hours, or an institution that measures educational program length in clock hours completes at least 900 clock hours.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94813.

“Accredited” means an institution is accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 840, Sec. 4.   (SB 1247)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94814.

“Accrediting agency” is an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94815.

“Annual report” means the yearly report required to be filed by institutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94816.

“Applicant” means a person, as defined in Section 94855, who has submitted an application to the bureau for an approval to operate or for a renewal of an approval to operate. An approval to operate shall be issued only to an applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 78.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94817.

“Approval to operate” or “approval” means the authorization pursuant to this chapter to offer to the public and to provide postsecondary educational programs, as well as the written document issued to an institution signifying its approval to operate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94817.5.

“Approved to operate” or “approved” means that an institution has received authorization pursuant to this chapter to offer to the public and to provide postsecondary educational programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94818.

“Avocational education” means education offered for the purpose of personal entertainment, pleasure, or enjoyment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94819.

“Branch campus” means a site other than the main campus or a satellite location.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94820.

“Bureau” means the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education in the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94821.

“Change in business organization form” means a change of a business organization’s original form, including, for example, a situation in which a sole proprietorship becomes a partnership or corporation, or when a business organization becomes a nonprofit public benefit corporation or forms a nonprofit public benefit corporation as a subsidiary to provide the educational programs for which the business organization has an approval to operate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94822.

“Change in control” means a change in the ownership of an institution in which a person who previously did not own at least 25 percent of the stock or interest in the institution or its parent company acquires ownership of at least 25 percent of the stock or interest in the institution or its parent company. “Change in control” does not include an ownership change between family members involving less than 51 percent of the stock or interest in the institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94823.

“Change in ownership” means the acquisition by a person of more than 50 percent of an interest in or stock of a parent company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94823.5.

“Change of location” means a move or relocation more than 10 miles from the site at which the institution offers instruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94824.

“Class day” means a day a student is scheduled to attend a class session, or for students receiving instruction through distance education, any calendar day except Saturday, Sunday, or any holiday enumerated in Section 6700 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94825.

“Class session” means part of a class day that an institution conducts instruction in a particular subject.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94826.

“Commence operations” means an institution has begun to provide educational programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94827.

“Continuing education” means instruction that does not lead to a degree in subjects that licensees are required to take solely for the purpose of continued licensure, or to enhance the licensee’s skills and knowledge within their particular profession, occupation, trade, or career field.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 552, Sec. 1.   (SB 802)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94828.

“Curriculum” means an organized set of courses or modules of instruction that are prerequisites to the award of a degree or diploma.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94829.

“Default” means failure of a borrower and endorser, if any, to make an installment payment for a loan received under the federal student financial aid programs when due, or to meet other terms of the promissory note, provided that this failure persists for 270 days if payment is due monthly or 360 days if payment is due less frequently. For purposes of this section, “endorser” means an individual who signs a promissory note and agrees to repay the loan in the event that the borrower does not.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 840, Sec. 6.   (SB 1247)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94830.

“Degree” means a recognized educational credential awarded by an institution that signifies satisfactory completion of the requirements of a postsecondary educational program at the associate’s level or above.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94831.

“Degree title” means the designated subject area of the educational program that appears on the face of the document awarded to a student.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94832.

“Diploma” means a recognized educational credential, other than a degree, awarded by an institution that signifies satisfactory completion of the requirements of a postsecondary educational program below the associate’s level. A diploma is also known as a certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94833.

“Director” means the Director of Consumer Affairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94834.

“Distance education” means transmission of instruction to students at a location separate from the faculty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 37.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94835.

“Document of record” means any document required to be maintained by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94836.

“Educational materials” means textbooks, supplies, implements, tools, machinery, computers, electronic devices, or other goods related to any education, training, or experience required for participation in an educational program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94837.

“Educational program” means a planned sequence composed of a set of related courses or modules, or a single course or module if not offered as a component of a set of related courses or modules, that provides education, training, skills, or experience, or a combination of these, except that “educational program” does not include a single course, workshop, seminar, continuing education course, or other instruction that consists of 32 hours of instruction or less that is not designed to lead to employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 552, Sec. 2.   (SB 802)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94838.

“Educational program approval” means authorization by the bureau, another government agency of this state, or a federal government agency, to provide educational programs, and is an element of an approval to operate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94839.

“Enrollment” means the execution of an enrollment agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94840.

“Enrollment agreement” means a written contract between a student and institution concerning an educational program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94841.

“Faculty” means the instructional staff of an institution, whether these persons are employees or independent contractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94842.

“Graduate” means an individual who has been awarded a degree or diploma.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94843.

“Institution” means any private postsecondary educational institution, including its branch campuses and satellite locations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94844.

“Institutional charges” means charges for an educational program paid directly to an institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94845.

“Institution manager” means an individual who is a member of an institution’s management.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94846.

“Instruction” means an institution’s specific, formal arrangements in which its faculty present a part of the curriculum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94847.

“License and examination preparation” means instruction designed to assist students to prepare for an examination for licensure. “License and examination preparation” does not include an educational program designed to instruct students in the skills and knowledge necessary to satisfy the qualifications for licensure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 840, Sec. 8.   (SB 1247)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94848.

“Licensure” includes any license, certificate, permit, or similar credential that a person must hold to lawfully engage in a profession, occupation, trade, or career field.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94849.

“Main campus” means the institution’s sole or primary teaching location.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94850.

“Noninstitutional charges” means charges for an educational program paid directly to an entity other than an institution that are specifically required for participation in an educational program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 79.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94850.2.

“Nonprofit corporation” means an institution to which contributions have been determined by the United States Internal Revenue Service to be tax-deductible pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the Internal Revenue Code, subject to the limitations described in Section 94874.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 153, Sec. 3.   (AB 70)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94850.5.

“Out-of-state private postsecondary educational institution” means a private entity without a physical presence in this state that offers distance education to California students for an institutional charge, regardless of whether the institution has affiliated institutions or institutional locations in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 593, Sec. 4.   (SB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94851.

“Owner” means an individual in the case of a sole proprietorship, partners in a partnership, members in a limited liability company, or shareholders in a corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94852.

“Ownership” means a legal or equitable interest in an institution, including ownership of assets or stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94853.

“Parent company” means a partnership, limited liability company, or corporation that owns more than 50 percent of the stock or interest in an institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94854.

“Period of attendance” means a semester, quarter, or trimester for educational programs measured in credit hours and the entire educational program if measured in clock hours.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94855.

“Person” means a natural person or a business organization, irrespective of its form.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94856.

“Person in control” means a person who, by the authority or conduct of their position, directs the management of an institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 80.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94857.

“Postsecondary education” means a formal institutional educational program whose instruction is designed primarily for students who have completed or terminated their secondary education or are beyond the compulsory age of secondary education, including programs whose purpose is academic, vocational, or continuing professional education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 552, Sec. 3.   (SB 802)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94858.

“Private postsecondary educational institution” means a private entity with a physical presence in this state that offers postsecondary education to the public for an institutional charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94858.5.

“Public institution of higher education” means any of the following:

(a) An institution that meets the definition of subdivision (a) of Section 66010, including a district or campus of the California Community Colleges.

(b) An institution operated by the United States government, a state, as defined in Section 3306(j)(1) of Title 26 of the United States Code, a local government, as defined in Section 1393(a)(5) of Title 26 of the United States Code, or Indian tribal government, as defined in Section 7701(a)(40) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(c) An institution that is an instrumentality of a state or local government if it meets all of the following:

(1) The institution’s employees are government employees.

(2) The institution’s liabilities are payable to the same degree as if they were liabilities of the state or local government, in the state or local government jurisdiction where the institution is formed.

(3) The institution is subject to the same financial oversight and open public records laws as the state or local government, in the state or local government jurisdiction where the institution is formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 153, Sec. 4.   (AB 70)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94859.

“Recruiter” means an employee of an institution whose principal job responsibilities are the recruitment of students other than on the institution’s premises.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94860.

“Recruitment” means actions taken by recruiters seeking enrollment of students.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94861.

“Reporting period” means the institution’s fiscal year or any yearly period designated by the bureau to be covered in the institution’s annual report.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94862.

“Satellite location” means an auxiliary classroom or teaching site within 50 miles of the branch or main location.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94865.

“Site” means a main or branch campus or satellite location.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94866.

“Teach-out” means the arrangements an institution makes for its students to complete their educational programs when the institution or an educational program ceases to operate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 38.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94867.

“Third-party payer” means an employer, government program, or other entity that pays a student’s total charges when no separate agreement for the repayment of the charges exists between the third-party payer and the student.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94868.

“To offer to the public” means to advertise, publicize, solicit, or recruit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94869.

“To operate” means to establish, keep, or maintain any facility or location in this state where, or from which, or through which, postsecondary educational programs are provided, or to enroll California residents in postsecondary educational programs in an institution based outside of the state via distance education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 3.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94870.

“Total charges” means the sum of institutional and noninstitutional charges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94871.

“Year” means a calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Exemptions [94874. - 94874.9.]

94874.

Except as provided in Sections 94874.2, 94874.7, and 94927.5, the following are exempt from this chapter:

(a) An institution that offers solely avocational or recreational educational programs.

(b) (1) An institution only offering educational programs to members of a bona fide trade, business, professional, or fraternal organization that is separate and distinct from the institution and that sponsors the educational programs. An institution that sponsors an educational program directly or through an affiliated division or corporate entity of the institution and that requires student membership for purposes of those educational programs does not qualify under this exemption.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), a bona fide organization, association, or council that offers preapprenticeship training programs, on behalf of one or more Division of Apprenticeship Standards-approved labor-management apprenticeship programs that satisfies one of the following conditions:

(i) It is not on the Eligible Training Provider List established and maintained by the California Workforce Development Board but has met the requirements for placement on the list.

(ii) It is on the Eligible Training Provider List established and maintained by the California Workforce Development Board and meets the requirements for continued listing.

(B) If an organization, association, or council has been removed from the Eligible
 Training Provider List established and maintained by the California Workforce Development Board for failure to meet performance standards, it is not exempt until it meets all applicable performance standards.

(c) A postsecondary educational institution established, operated, and governed by the federal government or by this state or its political subdivisions.

(d) An institution offering either of the following:

(1) Test preparation for examinations required for admission to a postsecondary educational institution.

(2) Continuing education or license examination preparation, if the institution or the program is approved, certified, or sponsored by any of the following:

(A) A government
 agency, other than the bureau, that licenses persons in a particular profession, occupation, trade, or career field.

(B) A state-recognized professional licensing body, such as the State Bar of California, that licenses persons in a particular profession, occupation, trade, or career field.

(C) A bona fide trade, business, or professional organization.

(e) (1) An institution owned, controlled, and operated and maintained by a religious organization lawfully operating as a nonprofit religious corporation pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 9110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The instruction is limited to the principles of that religious organization, or
 to courses offered pursuant to Section 2789 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) The diploma or degree is limited to evidence of completion of that education.

(2) An institution operating under this subdivision shall offer degrees and diplomas only in the beliefs and practices of the church, religious denomination, or religious organization.

(3) An institution operating under this subdivision shall not award degrees in any area of physical science.

(4) Any degree or diploma granted under this subdivision shall contain on its face, in the written description of the title of the degree being conferred, a reference to the theological or religious aspect of the degree’s subject area.

(5) A degree awarded under this subdivision shall reflect the nature of the degree title, such as “associate of religious studies,” “bachelor of religious studies,” “master of divinity,” or “doctor of divinity.”

(f) An institution that does not award degrees and that solely provides educational programs for total charges of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less when no part of the total charges is paid from state or federal student financial aid programs. The bureau may adjust this cost threshold based upon the California Consumer Price Index and post notification of the adjusted cost threshold on its internet website as the bureau determines, through the promulgation of regulations, that the adjustment is consistent with the intent of this chapter.

(g) A law school that is accredited by the Council of the Section of Legal Education and Admissions to the
 Bar of the American Bar Association or a law school or law study program that is subject to the approval, regulation, and oversight of the Committee of Bar Examiners, pursuant to Sections 6046.7 and 6060.7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(h) A nonprofit public benefit corporation that satisfies all of the following criteria:

(1) Is qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

(2) Is organized specifically to provide workforce development or rehabilitation services.

(3) Is accredited by an accrediting organization for workforce development or rehabilitation services recognized by the Department of Rehabilitation.

(i) An institution that is accredited
 by the Accrediting Commission for Senior Colleges and Universities, Western Association of Schools and Colleges, or the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges, Western Association of Schools and Colleges.

(j) Flight instruction providers or programs that provide flight instruction pursuant to Federal Aviation Administration regulations and meet both of the following criteria:

(1) The flight instruction provider or program does not require students to enter into written or oral contracts of indebtedness.

(2) The flight instruction provider or program does not require or accept prepayment of instruction-related costs in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(k) (1) An institution owned, controlled,
 operated, and maintained by a community-based organization, as defined in Section 7801 of Title 20 of the United States Code, as that section exists on March 1, 2017, that satisfies all of the following criteria:

(A) The institution has programs on or is applying for some or all of their programs to be on the Eligible Training Provider List established and maintained by the California Workforce Development Board.

(B) The institution is registered as a nonprofit entity qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

(C) The institution does not offer degrees, as defined in Section 94830.

(D) The institution does not offer educational programs designed to lead directly or specifically to positions in a profession, occupation,
 trade, or career field requiring licensure, if bureau approval is required for the student to be eligible to sit for licensure.

(E) The institution would not otherwise be subject to oversight of the bureau under this chapter if it did not receive funding under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.). For purposes of this requirement, funds received through the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.) do not count towards the total referenced in subdivision (f) or any other fee charge limitation condition for an exemption from this chapter.

(F) The institution can provide a letter from the local workforce development board that demonstrates the institution has met the initial criteria of that board.

(2) An institution granted an exemption
 pursuant to paragraph (1) shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(A) The institution shall provide to the Employment Development Department all required tracking information and data necessary to comply with performance reporting requirements under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, codified in Chapter 32 (commencing with Section 3101) of Title 29 of the United States Code, for programs on the Eligible Training Provider List.
